Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-191.01
Agency; prepare preventive maintenance plan; approval; implementation; funding.

On or before June 30, 1984, each agency shall have prepared and have on file with the task force a plan to provide adequate but not excessive preventive maintenance. The agency shall seek the advice of the task force in preparing and revising such plan. Agencies shall not be deemed in compliance with this provision until the task force has approved the preventive maintenance plan. Upon approval of such plan, the Governor may, upon recommendation of the task force, allocate funds from the Building Renewal Allocation Fund to initiate the implementation of the plan.

Laws 1980, LB 835, § 6;

Laws 1982, LB 604, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 838, § 3.